exercise6/checker.xfst
clear stack
read lexc /users/linyaodu/lda-t302/exercise6/Assignment_6_2_finnish_vowel_harmony.lexc
define Lexicon ;
regex Lexicon ;

define BackVowel    [ a | o | u ] ;
define FrontVowelOrBoundary   [ ä | ö | y | %^ ] ;

define SetBackVowel A -> a, O -> o || BackVowel ~$FrontVowelOrBoundary _ ;
define SetFrontVowel A -> ä, O -> ö || _ ;

define RemoveBoundaries %^ -> 0 ;

define LexiconWithRules Lexicon .o. SetBackVowel .o. SetFrontVowel .o. RemoveBoundaries ;

define Vocabulary [ LexiconWithRules ].l ;

define Noise1 [ k (->) j::0.5 ] ;

define VocabPlusKJ LexiconWithRules .o. Noise1 ;
define NoisyVocabularyKJ Vocabulary .o. Noise1 ;
define SpellCheckerKJ [ NoisyVocabularyKJ ].i ;

define Substitutions [ a (->) ä::0.3 ] .o. [ o (->) ö::0.3 ] .o.
                     [ u (->) y::0.3 ] .o. [ t (->) d::0.3 ] .o. 
                     [ m (->) n::0.3 ] ;

define Insertions    [ 0 (->) a::0.5 ] .o. [ 0 (->) e::0.5 ] .o.
                     [ 0 (->) i::0.5 ] .o. [ 0 (->) o::0.5 ] .o.
                     [ 0 (->) u::0.5 ] ;

define Deletions     [ h (->) 0::0.4 ] .o. [ p (->) 0::0.4 ] .o.
                     [ j (->) 0::0.4 ] .o. [ k (->) 0::0.4 ] .o.
                     [ l (->) 0::0.4 ] ;

define Transpositions  [ i e (->) e i::0.6 ] .o. [ l a (->) a l::0.6 ] .o.
                       [ k i (->) i k::0.6 ] .o. [ t a (->) a t::0.6 ] .o.
                       [ p ä (->) ä p::0.6 ] ;
                       
define NoisyVocabulary Vocabulary .o. Noise1 .o. Substitutions .o. Insertions .o. Deletions .o. Transpositions ;

define SpellChecker [ NoisyVocabulary ].i ;

regex SpellChecker ;
